Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-704
Certified registered nurse anesthetist, defined.

Certified registered nurse anesthetist means a licensed registered nurse certified by a board-approved certifying body and licensed under the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act to practice as a certified registered nurse anesthetist in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 234.

Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-201.